Florida, session 2026, HB707.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and paragraph
(a) of subsection (2) of section 501.95, Florida Statutes, are
amended to read:
501.95 Gift certificates and credit memos.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(b) "Gift certificate" means a certificate, gift card,
stored value card, reward card, consumer loyalty card,
promotional gift card, or similar instrument purchased for
monetary consideration when the certificate, card, or similar
instrument is redeemable for merchandise, food, or services
regardless of whether any cash may be paid to the owner of the
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb707-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 707 2026
certificate, card, or instrument as part of the redemption
transaction, but this term does shall not include tickets as
specified in s. 717.1355 or manufacturer or retailer discounts
and coupons.
(2)(a) A gift certificate purchased or credit memo issued
in this state may not have an expiration date, expiration
period, or any type of postsale charge or fee imposed on the
gift certificate or credit memo, including, but not limited to,
service charges, dormancy fees, account maintenance fees, or
cash-out fees. However, a gift certificate may have an
expiration date of not less than 3 years if it is provided as a
charitable contribution, or not less than 1 year if it is
provided as a benefit pursuant to an employee-incentive program,
and the expiration date is prominently disclosed in writing to
the consumer at the time it is provided. In addition, a gift
certificate may have an expiration date if it is provided to the
recipient, or to a purchaser for transfer to the recipient, as
part of a loyalty or promotional program when the recipient does
not pay a separate identifiable charge for the certificate, or
if it is provided in conjunction with a convention, conference,
vacation, or sporting or fine arts event having a limited
duration so long as the majority of the value paid by the
recipient is attributable to the convention, conference,
vacation, or event. An issuer may honor a gift certificate that
has expired on or before the effective date of this act.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb707-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 707 2026
Section 2. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 501.95, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of section
538.03, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
538.03 Definitions; applicability.—
(1) As used in this part, the term:
(i) "Secondhand goods" means personal property previously
owned or used which is not regulated metals property regulated
under part II and which is purchased, consigned, or traded as
used property. The term includes gift certificates and credit
memos as defined in s. 501.95 which are purchased, consigned, or
traded by a secondhand dealer. The term does not include office
furniture; pianos; books; clothing; organs; coins; motor
vehicles; costume jewelry; gold, silver, platinum, palladium, or
rhodium bullion that has been assayed and is properly marked as
to its weight and fineness; cardio and strength training or
conditioning equipment designed primarily for indoor use; and
secondhand sports equipment that is not permanently labeled with
a serial number. As used in this paragraph, the term "secondhand
sports equipment" does not include golf clubs.
Section 3. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 501.95, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, section 717.1045, Florida Statutes, is
reenacted to read:
717.1045 Gift certificates and similar credit items.—
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb707-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 707 2026
Notwithstanding s. 717.117, an unredeemed gift certificate or
credit memo as defined in s. 501.95 is not required to be
reported as unclaimed property.
(1) The consideration paid for an unredeemed gift
certificate or credit memo is the property of the issuer of the
unredeemed gift certificate or credit memo.
(2) An unredeemed gift certificate or credit memo is
subject only to any rights of a purchaser or owner thereof and
is not subject to a claim made by any state acting on behalf of
a purchaser or owner.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section
apply to the custodial holding of unredeemed gift certificates
and credit memos.
(4) However, a gift certificate or credit memo described
in s. 501.95(2)(b) shall be reported as unclaimed property. The
consideration paid for such a gift certificate or credit memo is
the property of the owner of the gift certificate or credit
memo.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb707-00